Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2631
Registration; expiration; renewal.

Registration of a pesticide shall expire annually on December 31 unless sooner canceled. A person who applies for renewal of registration shall include in the renewal application only information that is different from the information furnished at the time of the most recent registration or renewal. A registration in effect on December 31 for which a renewal application has been filed and renewal fees have been paid shall continue in effect until the department notifies the applicant that the registration has been renewed or denied renewal.

Laws 1993, LB 588, § 10.